Utah statutes.
59-14-705.   Cigarette rolling machine operator shall maintain a secure meter on cigarette rolling machine.

(1)  A cigarette rolling machine operator shall maintain a secure meter on each cigarette rolling machine that the cigarette rolling machine operator controls, leases, owns, possesses, or otherwise has available for use.

(2)  The secure meter described in Subsection (1):

(a)  shall maintain an accurate count of the cigarettes, by weight, dispensed by the cigarette rolling machine;

(b)  may not be accessed except to take a reading of the secure meter; and

(c)  may not be reset or otherwise altered.



Enacted by Chapter 148, 2013 General Session

